Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-3613
Durable medical equipment, prosthetic, orthotic, or supply; reimbursement.

An issuer of a medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not be required to reimburse a supplier or beneficiary in an amount greater than one hundred fifteen percent of the medicare-approved amount for durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, or supplies. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an issuer from negotiating the level and type of reimbursement with a supplier for covered durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, or supplies.

Laws 2024, LB852, § 4.